Illinois, session 104th, SB1089.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act is 5amended by changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 5/2)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7602)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 2. Title. This Act shall be known and and may be cited 9as the "Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act".10(Source: P.A. 84-1080.)